District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-1451.06

Incentives.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-234, § 7, 54 DCR 377
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-349, § 2(e), 58 DCR 724
June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-139, § 2(e), 59 DCR 2555

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1212.24 and § 6-1451.01.